North Dakota, session 69, HB1407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 39-12-05 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Subject to the limitations imposed by subsection 1 on tires, wheel, and axle loads, the
gross weight of which exceeds that determined by the formula of:
W = 500 (LN/ + 12N + 36)
N-1
where W equals maximum weight in pounds carried on any group of more than one
axle; L equals distance in feet between the extremes of any group of consecutive
axles; and N equals number of axles in the group under consideration, except that two
consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-four thousand
pounds [15422.14 kilograms] each, providing the overall distance between the first
and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is at least thirty-six feet [10.97
meters]. The gross weight may not exceed eighty thousandone hundred thirteen
thousand pounds [36287.3951255.94 kilograms].
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 39-12-05.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Subject to the limitations imposed by subsection 1 on tires, wheel, and axle loads, a
person may not operate on a highway that is not part of the interstate system any
vehicle the gross weight of which exceeds that determined by the formula of:
W = 500 (LN + 12N + 36)
Page No. 1 25.1122.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
N-1
where W equals the maximum gross weight in pounds on any vehicle or combination
of vehicles; L equals distance in feet between the two extreme axles of any vehicle or
combination of vehicles; and N equals the number of axles of any vehicle or
combination of vehicles under consideration. The gross weight on stateall highways
may not exceed one hundred five thousand five hundredone hundred thirteen
thousand pounds [4785451255.94 kilograms] unless otherwise posted and on all other
highways the gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand pounds [36287.39
kilograms] unlessor designated by local authorities for highways under their jurisdiction
for gross weights not to exceed one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds
[47854 kilograms]. Local authorities are encouraged to assess all roads under their
jurisdiction and designate the roads for the appropriate weight limits allowed under this
subsection.
Page No. 2 25.1122.01000